Utah statutes.
58-74-302.   Qualifications for licensure.
(1)  Each applicant for licensure as a certified court reporter under this
chapter shall:
(a)  be at least 18 years of age;
(b)  be a citizen of the United States;
(c)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;
(d)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(e)  possess a high degree of skill and ability in the art of court reporting;
(f)  produce satisfactory evidence of good moral character; and
(g)  submit evidence that they have completed and passed the Registered
Professional Reporter Examination of the National Court Reporters Association
or the Certified Verbatim Reporter Examination of the National Verbatim
Reporters Association.
(2)  Any person granted a certificate to practice as a certified shorthand
reporter may use the abbreviation "C.S.R." as long as the person's certificate
is current and valid.
(3)  Any person granted a certificate to practice as a certified voice
reporter may use the abbreviation "C.V.R." as long as the person's certificate
is current and valid.
